Indiana, session 2026, HB1197.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-22.5-6-2.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.2. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (c), when a physician recommends a hysterectomy or an
oophorectomy, the physician shall obtain oral and written
informed consent from the patient. The informed consent
procedure must ensure that the following information is given to
the patient at least two (2) weeks before the surgery is scheduled:
(1) Notice that the individual is free to withhold or withdraw
consent to the procedure at any time before the hysterectomy
or oophorectomy without affecting the right to future care or
treatment and without loss or withdrawal of any state or
federally funded program benefits to which the individual
might be otherwise entitled.
(2) A copy of the DVD entitled "Female Anatomy: The
Functions of the Female Organs" produced by the
Hysterectomy Educational Resources and Services (HERS)
2026 IN 1197—LS 6611/DI 104


Foundation, including a printed transcript of the text of the
DVD.
(3) A copy of the pamphlet entitled "An Introduction to
Hysterectomy: What Every Woman Needs to Know"
produced by the HERS Foundation.
(4) A color copy of the following diagrams:
(A) The female pelvic organs.
(B) Supporting structures of the female pelvic organs.
(C) Nerve supply to the uterus and ovaries.
(D) Arteries and veins that provide blood supply to the
female pelvic organs.
(b) The patient shall sign a written statement before the
hysterectomy or oophorectomy is performed, indicating the patient
has read the written information provided under subsection (a),
and that this information has been discussed by the patient and the
surgeon. The informed consent statement must indicate that the
patient has been advised by the patient's surgeon that the effects of
the hysterectomy are irreversible and the patient will be unable to
conceive. A patient may modify the consent form to require the
surgeon to stop the surgery and suture any open wounds under
specified circumstances. If the consent form is modified under this
subsection:
(1) any modification to the consent form must be
acknowledged with the initials of both the patient and the
surgeon on the consent form; and
(2) the surgeon shall provide the patient with a written copy
of the modified consent form with the acknowledgment
required under subdivision (1).
(c) The informed consent procedure under this section is not
required when the hysterectomy is performed in a life threatening
emergency situation in which the physician determines prior
written informed consent is not possible.
(d) If, after a hearing, the board finds that a physician or
surgeon has not complied with this section, the physician is subject
to disciplinary sanctions under IC 25-1-9.
2026 IN 1197—LS 6611/DI 104